Tennessee, session 114, SB1572.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as the "Safe Highways and Roads
Enforcement (SHARE) Act."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 55, Chapter 8, Part 2, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
Except as provided in § 55-10-403(e), in addition to the penalty authorized by this
title or title 39 for a traffic violation designated as a moving traffic violation under rules of
the driver improvement program established in § 55-50-505:
(1) For non-commercial motor vehicles, the court shall assess a fine of
twenty-five dollars ($25.00) to be collected by the respective court clerk and
transmitted to the treasurer for deposit in the state highway fund, to be used for
maintenance and infrastructure improvements of public roads, streets, highways,
bridges, and similar structures on the state system of highways and the state
system of interstate highways; and
(2) For commercial motor vehicles, the court shall assess a fine of fifty
dollars ($50.00) to be collected, transmitted, and used as provided in subdivision
(1).
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-10-403, is amended by adding
the following new subsection:
(e) In addition to the penalty authorized by this part for a violation of driving
under the influence of an intoxicant under § 55-10-401, the court shall assess a fine of
SB1572
010463
- 1 -

one hundred dollars ($100) to be collected, transmitted, and used as provided in
SECTION 2(1). If the person convicted of driving under the influence of an intoxicant is
also convicted of a moving traffic violation, then the court shall not assess the additional
fine for the moving traffic violation under SECTION 2 and shall only assess the
additional one-hundred-dollar fine in this subsection (e).
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to offenses committed on or after that date.
- 2 - 010463